Massachusetts, session 194th, H2033.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 32G of Chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new subsection :-
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, purchase, deliver, sell, or possess with
intent to sell or deliver a tableting machine, an encapsulating machine, or controlled substance
counterfeiting materials knowing, intending, or having reasonable cause to believe that it will be
used to manufacture a controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance. Any person who
violates this subsection shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a sentence of not less than 1
year and not more than 5 years in the state prison or county house of correction or by a fine of
not less than $25,000, or both such fine and imprisonment.
of 1